California statutes. Financial Code
(c) If the commissioner finds that the factors set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) are true with respect to a subject person or former subject person of a subject institution or holding company, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or opportunity to be heard, issue an order suspending or removing the subject person or former subject person from his or her office, if any, with the subject institution or holding company and prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the affairs of the subject institution or holding company without the approval of the commissioner:

(1) That the subject person or former subject person has been finally convicted of any crime of the type described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). For purposes of this paragraph, an agreement to enter a pretrial diversion or similar program is deemed to be a conviction.

(2) That continued or resumed service or participation by the subject person or former subject person may pose a threat to the interests of the customers of the subject institution or may threaten to impair public confidence in the subject institution.

(d) The fact that any subject person of a subject institution charged with a crime of the type described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is not finally convicted of the crime does not preclude the commissioner from issuing an order regarding the subject person pursuant to any other provision of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

588.

(a) Any subject institution, subject person of a subject institution, or former subject person of a subject institution to whom an order is issued under Sections 585 to 587, inclusive, may apply to the commissioner to modify or rescind the order. In deciding whether to grant or deny the application, the commissioner shall consider whether it is in the public interest to modify or rescind the order and whether it is reasonable to believe that the subject person or
 former subject person will, if and when he or she becomes a subject person of a subject institution or holding company, comply with all applicable provisions of law, or any regulation or order issued by the commissioner.

(b) The right of any subject person or former subject person of a subject institution or holding company to whom an order is issued under Sections 585 to 587, inclusive, to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the subject institution or holding company to apply to the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a) to modify or rescind the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

589.

(a) In this section, “subject financial institution” means any:

(1) Licensee or any bank or credit union that maintains an office in this state.

(2) Affiliate of any of the institutions specified in paragraph (1).

(3) Subsidiary of any of the institutions specified in paragraph (1).

(4) Holding company of any of the institutions specified in paragraph (1).

(b) It is unlawful for any subject person or former subject person of a
 subject financial institution to whom an order is issued under Sections 585 to 587, inclusive, willfully to do, directly or indirectly, any of the following without the approval of the commissioner, so long as the order is in effect:

(1) Act as a subject person of any subject financial institution.

(2) Vote any shares or other securities having voting rights for the election of any person as a director of a subject financial institution.

(3) Solicit, procure, transfer or attempt to transfer, or vote any proxy, consent, or authorization with respect to any shares or other securities of a subject financial institution having voting rights.

(4) Otherwise to participate in
 any manner in the affairs of any subject financial institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 27.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Suspension or Possession of a License [590. - 595.]

590.

The commissioner may revoke or suspend any license issued by, or under the authority of, the commissioner, if, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the commissioner finds any of the following:

(a) The licensee has violated, is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that the licensee is about to violate, any provision of any of the following:

(1) Any division subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner.

(2) Any regulation promulgated by, or subject to the jurisdiction of, the commissioner.

(3) A
 provision of any other applicable law.

(4) A provision of any order issued by the commissioner.

(5) A provision of any written agreement between the licensee and the commissioner.

(6) A condition imposed on any written approval granted by the commissioner.

(b) Any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time of the original application for the license, would be grounds for denying the application for the license.

(c) The licensee is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner.

(d) The licensee is in such
 condition that it is unsafe or unsound for the licensee to transact appropriate licensee business.

(e) The licensee has inadequate capital or net worth or is insolvent.

(f) The licensee failed to pay any of its obligations as they came due or is reasonably expected to be unable to pay its obligations as they come due.

(g) The licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under any bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, or that any person has applied for any such relief under any such law against the licensee and the licensee has by any affirmative act approved of, or consented to, the action or the relief has been granted.

(h) The licensee has ceased to transact the business the licensee is authorized to conduct pursuant to its license.

(i) The licensee refuses to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of any examiner.

(j) Any officer of the licensee refuses to be examined upon oath touching the concerns of the licensee.

(k) The licensee has, with the approval of its board, requested the commissioner to take possession of its property and business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 28.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

591.

If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 590 is true with respect to any licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the public interest, the commissioner may issue an order immediately suspending or revoking the licensee’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

592.

If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in subdivisions (a) to (k), inclusive, is true with respect to a licensee, the commissioner may by order, without any prior notice or opportunity to be heard, take possession of the property and business of the licensee:

(a) The licensee has violated any provision of (1) any division subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, (2) any regulation promulgated by,
 or subject to the jurisdiction of, the commissioner, (3) any provision of any other applicable law, (4) any provision of any order issued by the commissioner, (5) any provision of any written agreement made between the commissioner and the licensee, or (6) a condition imposed on any written approval granted by the commissioner.

(b) The licensee is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner.

(c) The licensee is in such condition that it is unsafe or unsound for the licensee to transact appropriate licensee business.

(d) The licensee has inadequate capital or net worth or is insolvent.

(e) If the licensee is a bank, the tangible shareholders’ equity of the bank is less than the following:

(1) If the bank is a commercial bank or industrial bank, the greater of three percent of the bank’s total assets or one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(2) If the bank is a trust company other than a commercial bank authorized to engage in trust business, one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(f) The licensee failed to pay any of its obligations as they came due or is reasonably expected to be unable to pay its obligations as they come due.

(g) The licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under any bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, or that any person has applied for any such relief under any such law against the licensee and the licensee has by any affirmative act approved of or consented to the action or the relief has been
 granted.

(h) The licensee has ceased to transact the business the licensee is authorized to conduct pursuant to its license.

(i) The licensee refuses to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of any examiner.

(j) Any officer of the licensee refuses to be examined upon oath touching the concerns of the licensee.

(k) The licensee has, with the approval of its board, requested the commissioner to take possession of its property and business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

593.

(a) If the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a licensee pursuant to Section 592, the licensee may, within 10 days, apply to the superior court in the county where its head office is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court may, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after a hearing, dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and order the
 commissioner to surrender the property and business of the licensee to the licensee or make any further order as may be just. The judgment of the court may be appealed by the commissioner or by the licensee as allowed by law.

(b) At any time after the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a licensee pursuant to Section 592, the licensee may, with the approval of the commissioner, resume business upon conditions as the commissioner may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

594.

(a) Upon taking possession of the property and business of any licensee, the commissioner shall give notice of that fact to all persons holding or having in their possession any assets of the licensee. No person knowing of the taking, or who has been notified thereof, shall have a lien or charge upon any assets of the licensee for any payment, advance, or clearance thereafter made or for any liability thereafter incurred.

(b) The giving of notice in accordance with this section shall not be deemed to be a prerequisite to the taking of possession of the property and business of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

595.

The commissioner is deemed to take possession of the entire property and business of a licensee when the commissioner takes possession of the business and property of the head office of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Liquidation and Conservation [600. - 710.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [600. - 609.]

600.

In this chapter, “Federal Insurance Agency” means the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration, as appropriate, or their respective successors-in-interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 29.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

601.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of any licensee, the commissioner has authority, and it is his or her duty, to collect all moneys due to the licensee and to do other acts as are necessary or expedient to collect, conserve, or protect the licensee’s assets, property, and business, and he or she shall proceed to conserve or liquidate the affairs of the licensee as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

602.

No attachment shall be issued against the property of any licensee subject to conservation or liquidation pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of any licensee pursuant to Section 592, the commissioner may proceed to liquidate or conserve the licensee in the manner provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

604.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of a licensee pursuant to Section 592, the commissioner may tender to any person or persons an appointment as conservator, liquidator, receiver, or liquidating committee of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

The commissioner shall supervise the acts of the conservator, liquidator, receiver, or liquidating committee appointed under this article and may remove the conservator, liquidator, receiver, or any or all members of the liquidating committee in his or her discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

606.

If required by the commissioner, the conservator, liquidator, receiver, or members of the liquidating committee appointed under this article shall provide proof of bond coverage that extends to the conservator, liquidator, receiver, or members of the liquidating committee. The bond shall include fraud, dishonesty, and faithful performance coverage. The premium for that bond shall be paid out of the assets of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

607.

(a) If the commissioner retains possession of the assets of the licensee for the purpose of liquidation or conservation, the commissioner shall, to the extent possible, use the services of civil service employees of the commissioner’s office, and the attorneys employed by the commissioner or the Department of Justice shall render all necessary legal services, as the commissioner may request.

(b) The
 commissioner, from time to time, under his or her official seal, may appoint one or more special deputy commissioners as his or her agent or agents with the powers specified in the certificate of appointment to assist him or her in the duties of conservation or of liquidation and distribution. The certificate of appointment shall be filed in the office of the commissioner and a certified copy in the office of the clerk of the county in which the head office of the licensee is located. The commissioner may employ counsel and procure expert assistance and advice as may be necessary in the liquidation and distribution of the assets of the licensee and for that purpose may retain any of the officers or employees of the licensee as the commissioner may deem necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

608.

The compensation of civil service employees, special deputies, counsel, and other employees and assistants appointed to assist in the conservation or liquidation of any licensee and the distribution of its assets and all expenses of supervision and liquidation shall be fixed by the commissioner and shall be paid out of the funds of the licensee in the hands of the commissioner. The expenses of liquidation shall be reported to the court upon each application for payment of a
 dividend.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

609.

If a licensee is not insured by a Federal Insurance Agency, upon the commissioner taking possession of the business and property of the licensee, the superior court of the State of California for the county in which the head office of the licensee is located shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of all proceedings relating thereto and of any action or other proceedings brought under the provisions of this article. All papers relating to the proceeding, including copies of the
 certificate of appointment of any special deputy and the inventories required to be filed, shall be filed and be made a part of the record of the proceeding without the payment of any additional fees. No damages may be awarded in the proceeding but, if sought, may only be recovered in a separate action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conservation or Liquidation of an Insured Licensee [620. - 624.]

620.

If the licensee whose property and business has been taken pursuant to Section 592 is insured by a Federal Insurance Agency, the commissioner may tender to the appropriate Federal Insurance Agency an appointment as conservator, liquidator, or receiver of the licensee. The commissioner shall determine whether the licensee whose property and business has been taken shall be liquidated or conserved. If the Federal Insurance Agency accepts the appointment, the Federal Insurance Agency shall have, in addition to any powers conferred by applicable federal law, the powers conferred on the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 190, Sec. 29.   (AB 1517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

621.

The Federal Insurance Agency may be, and act as, a conservator, liquidator, or receiver without bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

622.

If the Federal Insurance Agency accepts the appointment in accordance with Section 620, the rights of customers and other creditors of the insured licensee shall be determined in accordance with the applicable provisions of the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 190, Sec. 30.   (AB 1517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

The Federal Insurance Agency conservator, liquidator, or receiver shall possess with respect to the insured licensee all the powers, rights, and privileges given the commissioner under this article with respect to the conservation or liquidation of a licensee, as appropriate, and the property and assets of which he or she has taken possession, except insofar as the same may be in conflict with the provisions of applicable federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

624.

(a) The commissioner may sell to any other licensee any part or the whole of the business of a licensee that is subject to liquidation or conservatorship. The purchase and sale shall be approved by the purchasing licensee, as follows:

(1) If the purchasing licensee is organized under the laws of this state, by two-thirds of all of its directors.

(2) If the licensee is any licensee other than a licensee organized under the laws of this state, in accordance with the laws of the jurisdiction under which the licensee is organized.

(b) (1) Subject to any applicable federal statutes and regulations, any bank or credit union organized under the laws of this state may, with the approval of two-thirds of all of its directors, purchase from the receiver of a national banking association or a federal credit union the whole or any part of the business of the national banking association or federal credit union.

(2) Subject to any applicable federal statutes and regulations and any applicable laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign corporation is organized, any foreign corporation or office of a foreign corporation that is licensed by the commissioner to transact business in this state and
 that is authorized to accept shares or deposits in this state, may purchase from the receiver of a national banking association or federal credit union the whole or any part of the business of the national banking association or federal credit union.

(c) The provisions of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code shall not apply to any purchase and sale of the type described in subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) When a purchase and sale of the type described in subdivision (a) or (b) becomes effective, the licensee shall, ipso facto and by operation of law and without further transfer, substitution, act, or deed, to the extent provided in the agreement of the purchase and sale or in the order of the court approving the purchase and sale and except as withheld or limited by the agreement or by
 the order:

(1) Succeed to the rights, obligations, properties, assets, investments, shares, deposits, demands, and agreements of the licensee whose business is sold, subject to the right of every customer of a licensee to withdraw his or her shares or deposit in full on demand after the sale, irrespective of the terms under which the share or deposit was made.

(2) Succeed to the rights, obligations, properties, assets, investments, shares, deposits, demands, and agreements of the licensee whose business is sold under all trusts, executorships, administrations, guardianships, conservatorships, agencies, and other fiduciary or representative capacities, to the same extent as though the purchasing licensee had originally assumed, acquired, or owned the same, subject to the rights of trustors and beneficiaries under the trusts so sold to nominate another or succeeding trustee of the
 trust so sold after the sale.

(3) Succeed to and be entitled to take and execute the appointment to executorships, trusteeships, guardianships, conservatorships, and other fiduciary and representative capacities to which the licensee whose business is sold is or may be named in wills, whenever probated, or to which it is or may be named or appointed by any other instrument.

(e) For purposes of subdivision (d), any purchase and sale of the type referred to in subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be effective at the time provided in the agreement of the purchase and sale or in the order of the court approving the purchase and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conservatorship of an Uninsured Licensee [640. - 652.]

640.

Whenever the commissioner deems it necessary in order to conserve the assets of any licensee that does not have federal deposit or share insurance for the benefit of the customers and other creditors, he or she may appoint a conservator of the licensee and require the conservator to post a bond as the commissioner deems proper. The conservator, under the direction of the commissioner, shall take possession of the books, records, and assets of every description of the licensee and take any
 action as the conservator may deem necessary to conserve the assets of the licensee pending further disposition of its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

641.

A conservator appointed in accordance with Section 640 has all of the powers and rights with relation to the business and the property of the licensee for which he or she is appointed conservator as are possessed by the commissioner under this article with relation to a licensee of which the commissioner has taken possession, and the conservator is subject to the same obligations as are imposed upon the commissioner under this article. During the time that the conservator remains in
 possession of the licensee the rights of the licensee, and of all persons with respect thereto, subject to the other provisions of this article, are the same as if the commissioner had taken possession of the property and business of the licensee for the purposes of liquidation. All expenses of the conservatorship shall be paid out of the assets of the licensee and shall be a lien thereon which shall be prior to any other lien. The conservator shall receive a salary in an amount no greater than that which would be paid by the commissioner to a special deputy in charge of the liquidation of a licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

642.

The commissioner may order an examination at the earliest possible date of a licensee for which the commissioner has appointed a conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

643.

While any licensee is in the hands of a conservator, the commissioner may require the conservator to set aside and make available for withdrawal by customers and for payment to other creditors on a ratable basis such amounts as in the opinion of the commissioner may safely be used for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

644.

The commissioner, in his or her discretion, may permit the conservator to receive shares or deposits, but any shares or deposits received while the licensee is in the hands of a conservator shall be held as trust funds and shall not be subject to any limitation as to payment or withdrawal. The shares or deposits shall be segregated and shall not be used to liquidate any indebtedness of the licensee existing at the time the conservator was appointed or for the payment of any later
 indebtedness incurred for the purpose of liquidating any indebtedness of the licensee existing at the time the conservator was appointed. The shares or deposits shall be kept on hand in cash, invested in direct obligations of the United States, or deposited with the Federal Reserve Bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

645.

If the commissioner is satisfied that it may be done safely and that it would be in the public interest, he or she may terminate a conservatorship and permit the licensee for whom a conservator was appointed to resume the transaction of its business under the direction of its board, subject to any terms, conditions, restrictions, and limitations as the commissioner may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

646.

The conservator of a licensee that has been permitted to resume accepting member shares or deposits shall first cause a notice to be published in a newspaper of local circulation. The notice shall state the date on which the affairs of the licensee will be returned to its board and that the provisions of Section 644 will not be effective after 30 days from that date. The form of the notice and the newspaper in which the same is to be published shall be first approved by the commissioner.
 On the date of the publication of the notice, the conservator shall mail a copy of the notice to every person who made any deposit in the licensee after the date of the appointment of the conservator. The conservator shall address the copy of the notice to the persons who have made the deposits at the addresses appearing upon the books of the licensee. The conservator shall also mail a similar notice to every person making a deposit in the licensee after the date of the publication of the notice and before the affairs of the licensee are returned to its board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

647.

The commissioner may assess and collect from all licensees for whom a conservator is appointed their ratable share of the costs incurred in the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

648.

Any licensee that the commissioner has taken possession of pursuant to Section 592, and for which a conservator has been appointed pursuant to this article, may be reorganized under a plan that requires the consent of any of the following:

(a) Customers and other creditors of the licensee representing at least 75 percent in amount of its total member shares or deposits and other liabilities as shown by the books of the
 licensee, excluding member shares or deposits and other liabilities which are to be satisfied in full under the provisions of the plan.

(b) Stockholders owning at least two-thirds of the outstanding stock as shown by the books of the licensee.

(c) Members of the licensee.

(d) Customers and other creditors of the licensee representing at least 75 percent in amount of its total shares or deposits and other liabilities as shown by the books of the licensee, excluding shares or deposits and other liabilities that are to be satisfied in full under the provisions of the plan, and, if applicable to the licensee, of stockholders owning at least two-thirds of its outstanding stock as shown by the books of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

649.

All customers, creditors, stockholders, if applicable, and other interested persons shall be given notice of any proposed plan of reorganization in the manner and at the times as the commissioner directs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

650.

No plan of reorganization shall become effective until the commissioner finds that the plan is fair and equitable to all customers, creditors, and stockholders, if applicable, and is in the public interest and until the commissioner approves the same in writing, subject to any conditions, restrictions, and limitations as the commissioner may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

No creditor having security for the payment of his, her, or its claim shall be affected in his, her, or its right to enforce the security by the provisions of any plan for the reorganization of the licensee. Any plan of reorganization involving the reduction of claims of creditors shall apply only to that portion of a secured creditor’s loan that is not covered by the pledged security.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

652.

When any plan of reorganization becomes effective, all books, records, and assets of the licensee shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the plan and the affairs of the licensee shall be conducted by its board in the manner provided by the plan and under the conditions, restrictions, and limitations that may have been prescribed by the commissioner. When any plan of reorganization adopted and approved as herein provided becomes effective, all customers and other
 creditors and, if applicable, stockholders of the licensee, whether or not they have consented to the plan of reorganization, shall be fully and in all respects subject to and bound by the plan’s provisions and the claims of all customers and other creditors shall be treated as if they had consented to the plan of reorganization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Liquidation of an Uninsured Licensee [670. - 692.]

670.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of a licensee that does not have federal deposit or share insurance, the commissioner may sell, compromise, or compound any bad or doubtful debt owing the licensee for a principal sum not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), upon those terms as the commissioner may deem proper. If the principal sum thereof exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the commissioner may compromise, compound, or sell the debt upon those terms as the
 court may approve. If it appears improbable that a recovery on a debt can be had, and that the costs of an action to collect would be lost, and the principal sum thereof does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), the commissioner may determine that no suit thereon shall be brought. If the principal sum of that debt exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the commissioner may determine that no suit thereon be brought after obtaining approval of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

671.

The commissioner may sell any real or personal property of the licensee for cash or on credit and on any other terms and conditions as the commissioner may deem proper, subject to the approval of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

672.

(a) The commissioner may, with the approval of the court, sell any part or the whole of the business of a licensee to any other licensee. The purchase and sale shall be approved by the purchasing licensee, as follows:

(1) If the purchasing licensee is organized under the laws of this state, by two-thirds of all of its directors.

(2) If the licensee is any licensee other than a licensee organized under the laws of this state, in accordance with the laws of the jurisdiction under which the licensee is organized.

(b) (1) Subject to any applicable federal
 statutes and regulations, any bank or credit union organized under the laws of this state may, with the approval of two-thirds of all of its directors and of the commissioner, purchase from the receiver of a national banking association or a federal credit union the whole or any part of the business of the national banking association or federal credit union.

(2) Subject to any applicable federal statutes and regulations and any applicable laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign corporation is organized, any foreign corporation or any office of a foreign corporation that is licensed by the commissioner to transact business in this state and that is authorized to accept shares or deposits in this state, may, with the approval of the commissioner, purchase from the receiver of a national banking association or federal credit union the
 whole or any part of the business of the national banking association or federal credit union.

(c) The provisions of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code shall not apply to any purchase and sale of the type described in subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) When a purchase and sale of the type described in subdivision (a) or (b) becomes effective, the purchasing licensee shall, by operation of law and without further transfer, substitution, act, or deed, to the extent provided in the agreement of the purchase and sale or in the order of the court approving the purchase and sale and except as withheld or limited by the agreement or by the order:

(1) Succeed to the rights, obligations, properties, assets, investments, shares, deposits, demands, and agreements of the licensee whose business is sold, subject to the right of every customer of the licensee whose shares or deposit is sold to
 withdraw his or her shares or deposit in full on demand after the sale, irrespective of the terms under which the deposit was made.

(2) Succeed to the rights, obligations, properties, assets, investments, shares, deposits, demands, and agreements of the licensee whose business is sold under all trusts, executorships, administrations, guardianships, conservatorships, agencies, and other fiduciary or representative capacities, to the same extent as though the purchasing licensee had originally assumed, acquired, or owned the same, subject to the rights of trustors and beneficiaries under the trusts so sold to nominate another or succeeding trustee of the trust so sold after the sale.

(3) Succeed to and be entitled to take and execute the appointment to executorships,
 trusteeships, guardianships, conservatorships, and other fiduciary and representative capacities to which the licensee whose business is sold is or may be named in wills, whenever probated, or to which it is or may be named or appointed by any other instrument.

(e) For purposes of subdivision (d), any purchase and sale of the type referred to in subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be effective at the time provided in the agreement of the purchase and sale or in the order of the court approving the purchase and sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 31.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

673.

Within six months after taking possession of the property and business of any licensee that does not have federal deposit or share insurance, the commissioner may terminate or adopt any executory contract to which the licensee may be a party, including leases of real or personal property. Claims for damages resulting from the termination of any contract or lease may be filed and allowed, but no claim of a landlord for damages resulting from the rejection of an unexpired lease of real
 property or under any covenant of the lease shall be allowed in an amount exceeding the rent reserved by the lease, without acceleration, for the year succeeding the date of the surrender of the premises plus the amount of any unpaid accrued rent without acceleration. Any claim shall be filed within 30 days of the date of the termination or within the time that claims are to be filed under Section 680, whichever is longer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

674.

The commissioner, in his or her own name or in the name of the licensee, may execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all conveyances and other instruments necessary or appropriate to effectuate the sale of any real or personal property or to effectuate any other transaction in connection with the liquidation of a licensee or the distribution of its assets. Any conveyance or other instrument executed by the commissioner pursuant to this authority shall be valid and effectual for all